Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of  Revenue, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Administration..........................  $ 43,149,121
(2) Property Tax Division ............... $ 25,675,108
(3) Personal Tax and
Compliance Division.................. $ 76,431,274
(4) Business Division ...................... $ 26,927,493
(5) Collections Division................... $ 39,394,176
(6) Information Technology
Services Division....................... $ 52,265,493
(7) Debt service and
related costs ............................. $ 5,233,018
(8) Nonprofit housing program....... $ 3,792,543
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in this section, collected or received by the Department  of Revenue, for the
following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 16,213,660
(2) Property Tax Division ............... $ 39,399,725
(3) Personal Tax and
Compliance Division.................. $ 1,903,144
(4) Business Division ...................... $ 17,880,861
(5) Collections Division................... $ 23,311,861
(6) Corporate Division .................... $ 18,730,073
(7) Information Technology
Services Division....................... $ 15,583,793
(8) Marijuana program ................... $ 4,474,970
Enrolled Senate Bill 5536 (SB 5536-A) Page 1
(9) Senior Property Tax
Deferral program ...................... $ 26,123,197
(10) Information System
projects ..................................... $ 6,353,430
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5536 (SB 5536-A) Page 2